Washington statutes.
RCW 36.92.040

Central services fund.

When a central services department is created, the board shall establish a central services fund for the payment of all costs of conducting those services for which such department was organized and annually budget therefor. It may make transfers into the central services fund from the current expense fund and receive funds for such purposes from other departments and recipients of such services.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 103 s 5.]